Utah statutes.
78A-6-1102.   Amendment of petition -- When authorized -- Continuance of proceedings.

When it appears during the course of any proceeding in a minor's case that the evidence presented points to material facts not alleged in the petition, the court may consider the additional or different matters raised by the evidence, if the parties consent.  The court on motion of any interested party or on its own motion shall direct that the petition be amended to conform to the evidence.  If the amendment results in a substantial departure from the facts originally alleged, the court shall grant such continuance as justice may require.

